Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.130

Issuance of licenses—Persons licensed in other jurisdictions.

(1) Any person who is properly licensed in any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or foreign country shall be eligible for examination if the applicant submits the approved application and fee and provides proof to the director that he or she is currently licensed in good standing as a cosmetologist, hair designer, barber, manicurist, esthetician, master esthetician, instructor, or the equivalent in that jurisdiction. Upon passage of the required examinations the appropriate license will be issued.

(2)(a) The director shall, upon passage of the required examinations, issue a license as master esthetician to an applicant who submits the approved application and fee and provides proof to the director that the applicant is currently licensed in good standing in esthetics in any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or foreign country and holds a diplomate of the comite international d'esthetique et de cosmetologie diploma, or an international therapy examination council diploma, or a certified credential awarded by the national coalition of estheticians, manufacturers/distributors & associations.

(b) The director may upon passage of the required examinations, issue a master esthetician license to an applicant that is currently licensed in esthetics in any other state, territory, or possession of the United States, or foreign country and submits an approved application and fee and provides proof to the director that he or she is licensed in good standing and:

(i) The licensing state, territory, or possession of the United States, or foreign country has licensure requirements that the director determines are substantially equivalent to a master esthetician license in this state; or

(ii) The applicant has certification or a diploma or other credentials that the director determines has licensure requirements that are substantially equivalent to the degree listed in (a) of this subsection.

[ 2015 c 62 s 5; 2013 c 187 s 5; 1991 c 324 s 10; 1984 c 208 s 11.]